Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2737
Appeal; appellant; pay costs; when.

In all cases involving a money judgment, if any person appealing from a judgment rendered in his or her favor shall not recover a greater sum than the amount for which judgment was rendered, besides costs and the interest accruing thereon, such appellant shall pay the costs of such appeal.

Laws 1981, LB 42, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-541.10;

Laws 1995, LB 538, § 6.

In all matters arising under the Nebraska Probate Code, if it shall appear to the district court that an appeal was taken vexatiously or for delay, the court shall adjudge that the appellant shall pay the cost thereof, including an attorney fee, under subsection (2) of this section. In re Estate of Miller, 231 Neb. 723, 437 N.W.2d 793 (1989).